Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.350

Court recess while jury is out.

While the jury is absent the court may adjourn from time to time, in respect to other business, but it is nevertheless to be deemed open for every purpose connected with the cause submitted to the jury until a verdict is rendered or the jury discharged.

[ 1957 c 9 s 2; Code 1881 s 235; 1877 p 49 s 239; 1869 p 58 s 239; 1854 p 166 s 197; RRS s 355.]